Utah statutes.
76-3-205.   Infraction conviction -- Fine, forfeiture, and disqualification.

(1) A person convicted of an infraction may not be imprisoned but may be subject to a fine, forfeiture, and disqualification, or any combination.

(2)  Whenever a person is convicted of an infraction and no punishment is specified, the person may be fined as for a class C misdemeanor.

